Colorado statutes. TITLE 16 Criminal Proceedings
ARTICLE 13
SPECIAL PROCEEDINGS

Editor's note:

This article was repealed and reenacted in 1972. For historical information concerning the repeal and reenactment, see the editor's note before the article 1 heading.

Law reviews:

For article, "

C

olorado Felony Sentencing - an Update", see 14

C

olo. Law. 2163 (1985); for article, "Felony Sentencing in Colorado", see 18 Colo. Law. 1689 (1989).

Section

PART 1 SENTENCING OF HABITUAL CRIMINALS

PART 2 SENTENCING OF SEX OFFENDERS

PART 3 ABATEMENT OF PUBLIC NUISANCE

PART 4 PRESERVATION OF THE PEACE

PART 5 COLORADO CONTRABAND FORFEITURE ACT

PART 6 RECEIPT OF FEDERALLY
FORFEITED PROPERTY

PART 7 REPORTING AND DISPOSITION
OF FORFEITED PROPERTY

PART 8 LIFETIME SUPERVISION
OF SEX OFFENDERS

PART 9 COMMUNITY NOTIFICATION
CONCERNING SEXUALLY
VIOLENT PREDATORS

PART 10 RESENTENCING HEARING FOR JUVENILE OFFENDERS
SERVING LIFE SENTENCES